California, session 20252026, SB1008.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21080.14 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.14. (a) This division does not apply to the closure of a railroad grade crossing by order of the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1201) of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code, if the Public Utilities Commission finds the crossing to present a threat to public safety.(b) This section does not apply to any crossing for high-speed rail, as defined in Section 185012 of the Public Utilities Code, or any crossing for a project carried out by the High-Speed Rail Authority, as described in Section 185020 of the Public Utilities Code, or a successor agency.(c) (1) Whenever a state agency determines that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section, and it approves or determines to carry out the project, the state agency shall file a notice with the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation in the manner specified in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 21108.(2) Whenever a local agency determines that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section, and it approves or determines to carry out the project, the local agency shall file a notice with the State Clearinghouse in the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation and with the county clerk in each county in which the project will be located in the manner specified in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 21152.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.SEC. 3. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to continue to protect public safety, and to allow local agencies the time needed to make long-term planning decisions, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.